Alabama, session 2026rs, SB128.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Pursuant to the Alabama Sunset Law, the
Sunset Committee recommends the continuance of the Alabama
Sickle Cell Oversight and Regulatory Commission until October
1, 2030, with additional recommendation for statutory change
as set out in Sections 3 and 4.
Section 2. The existence and functioning of the Alabama
Sickle Cell Oversight and Regulatory Commission, created and
functioning pursuant to Sections 22-10B-1 to 22-10B-7,
Page 1

functioning pursuant to Sections 22-10B-1 to 22-10B-7,
SB128 Enrolled
inclusive, Code of Alabama 1975, is continued until October 1,
2030, and those code sections are expressly preserved.
Section 3. Section 22-10B-1 and 22-10B-2, Code of
Alabama 1975, are amended to read as follows:
"§22-10B-1
(a) There is created and, beginning on October 1, 2026,
established as a division within the Alabama Department of
Public Health, the Alabama Sickle Cell Oversight and
Regulatory Commission.
(b) The department shall provide to the commission all
administrative services necessary for the commission to carry
out its duties, including:
(1) Financial services;
(2) Legal services;
(3) Dedicated office space;
(4) Administrative staff, who are shared with or
dedicated solely to the commission, and other personnel as
necessary for the efficient operation of the commission;
(5) Information technology services, including website
maintenance and dedicated phone lines and email addresses for
commission members and staff; and
(6) Necessary office furniture and supplies.
(c)(1) Any contract or binding agreement for
administrative services executed by the commission before the
effective date of this act shall continue in effect until
expiration or termination as provided by its terms. After
expiration or termination, the department shall assume all
administrative services provided by subsection (b).
Page 2

administrative services provided by subsection (b).
SB128 Enrolled
(2) The commission may enter into a contract or other
agreement for the provision of administrative services so long
as the agreement terminates on or before October 1, 2026.
(d) When necessary, the department may retain the
services of outside experts, including an executive director,
accountants, attorneys, and consultants using funds
appropriated for use by the commission on behalf of the
commission.
(e) On October 1, 2026, all real and personal property
and all other effects of the commission shall transfer to the
department."
"§22-10B-2
(a) The commission shall consist of the following
members:
(1) Two members shall be appointed by the Governor.
(2) One member shall be appointed by the University of
South Alabama Comprehensive Sickle Cell Center.
(3) One member shall be appointed by the University of
Alabama-Birmingham Alabama at Birmingham.
(4) One member shall be appointed by the Children's
Hospital of Birmingham Alabama.
(5) Each of the seven chapters of the Sickle Cell
Disease Association of America-Alabama Chapter, Incorporated,
shall appoint one member.
(b)(1) Appointees to the commission shall be citizens
residents of this state and shall be subject to confirmation
by the Senate, and upon confirmation, serve for a term of four
years. The membership of the commission shall be inclusive and
Page 3

years. The membership of the commission shall be inclusive and
SB128 Enrolled
reflect the racial, gender, geographic, urban/rural urban,
rural, and economic diversity of the state. The commission
shall annually report to the Legislature by the second
legislative day of each regular session the extent to which
the commission has complied with the diversity provisions of
this subsection subdivision. In the event of the death or
resignation of any member of the commission, a successor shall
be appointed by the original appointing authority and the
successor appointed to the vacancy shall serve for the
remainder of the unexpired term. The members shall elect from
their membership a chair and a vice chair at an organizational
meeting held no later than 30 days after appointments to the
commission are confirmed.
(2) All appointees shall serve their appointed terms
unless the Senate elects to consider and then rejects an
100 appointment. The entire Senate or the Senate Committee on
101 Confirmations may elect to consider an appointment. If an
102 appointment is rejected by the Senate Committee on
103 Confirmations, the rejection shall be considered a rejection
104 by the entire Senate.
105 (c) Members of the commission shall receive no salaries
106 but may be reimbursed for actual and necessary expenditures
107 incurred in the performance of their official duties pursuant
108 to Article 2 of Chapter 7 of Title 36. Expenses of the
109 commission are to be paid from funds available to the
110 commission.
111 (d) A member who has failed to attend three consecutive
112 properly noticed meetings may be removed at the request of the
Page 4

properly noticed meetings may be removed at the request of the
SB128 Enrolled
113 commission."
114 Section 4. Section 22-10B-7, Code of Alabama 1975,
115 relating to the Alabama Sickle Cell Oversight and Regulatory
116 Commission, is repealed.
117 Section 5. The Legislature concurs in the
118 recommendations of the Sunset Committee as provided in
119 Sections 1, 2, 3, and 4.
120 Section 6. This act shall become effective immediately.
Page 5

Section 6. This act shall become effective immediately.
SB128 Enrolled
121
122
123
124
125
126
127 ________________________________________________
128 President and Presiding Officer of the Senate
129
130
131
132 ________________________________________________
133 Speaker of the House of Representatives
134
135
136 SB128
137 Senate 20-Jan-26
138 I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and passed
139 the Senate, as amended.
140
141 Patrick Harris,
142 Secretary.
143
144
145
146
147 House of Representatives
148 Amended and passed: 19-Feb-26
149
150
151
152
153 Senate concurred in House amendment 19-Feb-26
154
155
156
157
158 By: Senator Coleman-Madison
Page 6